Utah statutes.
30-1-12.   Clerk to file license and certificate.

(1)  The license, together with the certificate of the person officiating at the marriage, shall be filed and preserved by the clerk, and shall be recorded by him in a book kept for that purpose, or by electronic means.  The record shall be properly indexed in the names of the parties so married.

(2)  A transcript shall be promptly certified and transmitted by the clerk to the state registrar of vital statistics.



Amended by Chapter 154, 1988 General Session

